Utah statutes.
58-16a-903.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Alternative channels of distribution" means any mail order company, Internet retailer, pharmacy, buying club, department store, or mass merchandise outlet, without regard to whether it is associated with a prescriber, unless the account meets the definition of a competitor as provided for in this section.

(2)  "Competitor" means an entity that manufactures contact lenses and sells those lenses within the state in direct competition with any other manufacturer.

(3)  "Manufacturer" means a manufacturer, its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, successors, and assigns.

(4)  "Prescriber" means an individual licensed or authorized to prescribe contact lenses under this title.



Enacted by Chapter 245, 2006 General Session

